Maryland, session 2025, SB0832.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
14–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(q) (1) “Zoning law” means the legislative implementation of regulations for
zoning by a local jurisdiction.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0832*

SENATE BILL 832
(2) “Zoning law” includes a zoning ordinance, zoning regulation, zoning
code, and any similar legislative action to implement zoning controls in a local jurisdiction.
20–709.
(A) [A] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A municipal
corporation in Prince George’s County that is in the regional district may not exercise any
powers relating to planning, subdivision control, or zoning not granted to the municipal
corporation by the district council under § 25–303 of this article.
(B) (1) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY THAT
IS IN THE REGIONAL DISTRICT MAY OVERRIDE A ZONING LAW MADE BY THE
DISTRICT COUNCIL IF THE ZONING LAW AFFECTS LAND WITHIN THE JURISDICTION
OF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
(2) AN ACTION BY A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF THE MEMBERS OF THE GOVERNING
BODY OF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
22–119.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection AND
SUBJECT TO § 20–709(B) OF THIS DIVISION, within the regional district, the zoning
powers vested by Division I of this article in a municipal corporation or the council of a
municipal corporation within the regional district shall be construed to be vested
exclusively in the appropriate district council.
(2) A municipal corporation in Prince George’s County has concurrent
jurisdiction with Prince George’s County to enforce zoning laws in the boundaries of the
municipal corporation.
(3) The power to enforce zoning laws for the City of Takoma Park and the
Town of Kensington is as provided in §§ 24–201 and 24–202 of this article, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.